Utah statutes.
57-10-7.   Coordinates required to be based on control stations.

(1)  Coordinates based on either the Utah Coordinate System of 1927 or the Utah Coordinate System of 1983 that purport to define the position of a point on a land boundary shall be based on a monumented horizontal control station established in conformity with the standards of accuracy and specifications for first or second order geodetic surveying, as prepared and published by the Federal Geodetic Control Committee (FGCC) of the United States Department of Commerce.

(a)  Standards and specifications of the FGCC or its successor in force on the date of the survey shall apply.

(b)  Publishing existing control stations, or the acceptance with intent to publish the newly established stations, by the National Ocean Service/National Geodetic Survey constitutes evidence of adherence to the FGCC specifications.

(2)  Control stations which have been established by agencies of the state or its political subdivisions may also be used, provided those points are established in conformity with the standards set forth in Section 57-10-6.

